Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 6. Federal Aid

§ 21-2-601.
Designation of boards as agencies to receive federal funds; powers of boards.

The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming is hereby authorized to accept any funds or grants made to the University of Wyoming by the United States to be used for education, research or other purposes. The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming is hereby authorized to accept the terms and provisions of any act of congress relating to any federal grants made for the purposes herein provided and said funds so granted or allocated to the said university shall be under the control of and expended by the said board of trustees of said university.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 118, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 67-222; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-58, 21-58.1; Laws 1965, ch. 44, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 111, § 237; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-237; W.S. 1977, §

21-13-401

; Laws 1987, ch. 190, §§ 4, 5.

§ 21-2-602.
Acceptance of funds not mandatory; local control of schools not to be surrendered.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to make acceptance of funds provided herein mandatory to any school district, nor shall anything herein contained be considered as a directive or authority to surrender any degree of local control of the schools of the state by the state board of education or any other school authority.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 44, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-58.2; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 238; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-238; W.S. 1977, §

21-13-402

; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 4.

§ 21-2-603.
Powers of state treasurer; monies donated to state.

Whenever the state of Wyoming shall be entitled to receive any monies or funds from the United States of America, or from any other source or authority, to be expended for the benefit of the public schools of the state, or held or in any manner applied for their benefit, the state treasurer is hereby authorized to receive and receipt for such monies or funds, and to make such application and use of the same as may be required by law. Should such monies or funds be donated to the state, and should the act of donation require such monies or funds to be applied or held, or used in a particular manner, they shall be so applied.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 101, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3981; R.S. 1899, § 622; C.S. 1910, § 1973; C.S. 1920, § 2279; R.S. 1931, § 99-350; C.S. 1945, § 67-213; W.S. 1957, § 21-48; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 239; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-239; W.S. 1977, § 21-13-403; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 4.